Utah statutes.
36-11-403.   Lobbying without a license.

(1)  No person may engage in any lobbying activities:

(a)  without the license required by this chapter;

(b)  during the period of any bar from obtaining a license; or

(c)  when the license has been suspended or revoked.

(2)  The attorney general may seek injunctive relief against any person violating this section.

